Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201560-6,152.01
Person operating wheelchair; rights and duties applicable to pedestrian.

Any disabled person operating a manual or motorized wheelchair on a sidewalk or across a roadway or shoulder in a crosswalk shall have all the rights and duties applicable to a pedestrian under the same circumstances.

Laws 2015, LB641, § 2.